Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-1752
Removal of garbage or refuse; authorized; procedure; costs.

(1) Any city or village may provide for the collection and removal of garbage or refuse found upon any lot or land within its corporate limits or extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction or upon the streets, roads, or alleys abutting such lot or land which constitutes a public nuisance. The city or village may require the owner, duly authorized agent, or tenant of such lot or land to remove the garbage or refuse from such lot, land, streets, roads, or alleys.

(2) Notice that removal of garbage or refuse is necessary shall be given to each owner or owner's duly authorized agent and to the tenant if any. Such notice shall be provided by personal service or by certified mail. After providing such notice, the city or village shall, in addition to other proper remedies, remove the garbage or refuse, or cause it to be removed, from such lot, land, streets, roads, or alleys.

(3) If the mayor or city manager of such city or chairperson of the village board of trustees of such village declares that the accumulation of such garbage or refuse upon any lot or land constitutes an immediate nuisance and hazard to public health and safety, the city or village shall remove the garbage or refuse, or cause it to be removed, from such lot or land within forty-eight hours after notice by personal service or following receipt of a certified letter in accordance with subsection (2) of this section if such garbage or refuse has not been removed.

(4) Whenever any city or village removes any garbage or refuse, or causes it to be removed, from any lot or land pursuant to this section, such city or village shall, after a hearing conducted by the city council or village board of trustees, assess the cost of the removal against such lot or land.

Laws 1988, LB 934, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 114.